apertium-hyw.hyw.lexd
## attributive
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst 
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg: SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst 
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:  SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 


PATTERN ParticipleInflectable
PerfectPart
SubjectPart
ProspectivePart

PATTERN AdjAdvDeclRegular
#Exploit this for definite-marked adverbs like ընդամէնը. would be nice to remove the subst feature from them TO DO

#Used as normal adjective/adverb
AdjAdvBaseDegreed

#Singular definite
#Without case
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  (Def|Poss)
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0  (Def|Poss) # Dir/LR
#With case, with/without definite
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)? 
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

#attributive
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst 
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR


#Plural
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss  # Dir/LR


PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreed
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimple
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimple AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimple
#Bare adjectives
AdjReg AdjZero
#Bare adverbs
AdvReg AdvZero
#Multi-POS
AdvAdjReg 	[<adv_adj>:] # Dir/LR
AdvAdjOren 	[<adv_adj>:] #Dir/LR
AdvAdjReg 	NouNinflBoundaryRed [<adv_adj>:] # Dir/LR
AdvAdjOren 	NouNinflBoundaryRed [<adv_adj>:] #Dir/LR

#Derived adverbs
AdjReg AdvOren
AdjReg NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren # Dir/LR
AdvAdjReg [<adj>:] AdvOren
AdvAdjReg [<adj>:] NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren # Dir/LR
NounAdjReg [<n_adj>:] AdvOren
NounAdjReg [<n_adj>:] NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren # Dir/LR


PATTERN NounOtherPOSDeclRegular

#Singular
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst # Dir/LR

#Plural
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
NounOtherPOSBase NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss  # Dir/LR

PATTERN NounOtherPOSBase
AdvNounReg [<adv_noun>:]
NounAdjReg [<noun_adj>:]

PATTERN NounDeclRisingClusters
#This is for nouns like մեղր which can variably take եր ներ
#Because of speaker-variation in syllabification

NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlVary CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlVary CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?    # Dir/LR

NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlVary  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlVary  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss   # Dir/LR
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlVary  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlVary  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss   # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR

NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlVary AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
NounRisingClusters NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlVary AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst # Dir/LR



PATTERN NounDeclIrregMonoWithN
#These are for nouns which are monosyllabic but take ներ, whether descriptively or prescriptively

#For nouns which take ներ prescriptively but not in practice
#I give a special diacritic in the plural -ner so that it can trigger reduction
#Singular մուկ մուկէ մկնէ 
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NSg0 [:ն]? CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NSg0 [:ն]? AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR

#Plural
#մուկեր
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#մկեր
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
#մուկներ մկներ
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary|NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NPlNerOnly CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?    # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary|NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NPlNerOnly AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst    # Dir/LR


#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#I manually add the ն for singular forms before the plural possessive
#մուկերնիս
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss 
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

#մկերնիս
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss    # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss   # Dir/LR

#մուկներնիս, I have to force -er 
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary (NSg0 [:ներ])|NPlNerOnly  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlNerOnly  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss   # Dir/LR

#մկներնիս
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer (NSg0 [:ներ])|NPlNerOnly  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NSg0|NPlNerOnly  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss   # Dir/LR


#For nouns which take ներ both prescriptively and in practice
#It's just լեռ
#Singular լեռէ լեռնէ
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary [:ն] NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary [:ն] NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlNerOnly CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlNerOnly AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
#I manually add the ն for singular forms before the plural possessive
# Have to force եր inside the singular
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary (NSg0 [:ներ])|NPlNerOnly  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss 
NounIrregMonoNerStill NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlNerOnly  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss 


PATTERN NounDeclUtjunSuffix
#paradigm of suffix ութիւն
#Singular caseless
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)?  
#Singular archaic case
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseUtjunArchaic (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular regular case
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?    # Dir/LR

#Plural 
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#Archaic -ութեանց for plural genitive/dat
NounUtjunSuffix NZero NouNinflBoundary CaseUtjunArchaicPlural   # Dir/LR
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero	 NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss


#attributive, arak included թեանիս
NounUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveUtjun
NounUtjunSuffix NUtjunSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst


PATTERN NounDeclOldAnForm
#These are nouns which can take -ան in the dative
#The -an form is rather antiquated and with only a few words
#The -an then triggers arbitrary reduction
#My cheat is that this pattern only forms the dative
#The words should have a regular version in the regular list
#So this pattern only derives գարուն գարնան

NounOldAnForm NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn  (Def|Poss)? 

PATTERN NounDeclUmSuffix
#pattern for suffix ում

#Singular caseless
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular regular case
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  
#Singular archaic oblique cases like ուսմանէ ուսմամբ
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicAn AblReg (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 InstArchaicAmp (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR



#Plural (already know it's polysyllabic)
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase  NZero	 NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounUmSuffix NUmSuffixBase  NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss


#attributive,
NounUmSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveUm 
NounUmSuffix  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveUm 


PATTERN NounDeclOldOch
#These are nouns which can take -ոջ in the dative
#The -ոջ form is rather antiquated and with only a few words
#The -ոջ then triggers arbitrary reduction
#My cheat is to use separate reduced stems
#The obliques optionally take մ
#So this pattern   derives կին կնոջ կնոջմէ կնոջէ and regularizedform

#Singular caseless ընկեր կին
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 
#Singular archaic case with oblique forms ընկերոջ ընկերոջմէ կնոջ կնոջմէ
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicOch (CaseBoundaryM CaseRegOblique)? (Def|Poss)? 
 #without nasal boundary ընկերոջէ կնոջէ
NounDecOldOchObliqueStem NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenArchaicOch CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
#Singular regular case
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

#Plural 
NounDecOldOchNominativeStem  NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
